Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1915
Appeal; unpaid costs itemized in order; payment.

The order of the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court shall itemize the costs due and unpaid in each case, which costs shall be paid to the clerk of the district court and shall be paid by such clerk to the party adjudged entitled to the same.

Laws 1929, c. 72, § 2, p. 253;

C.S.1929, § 20-1915;

R.S.1943, § 25-1915;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 55.